epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/cy.xml
		tan3w
		t3ao
		3tar4d
		tar4f
		t1as
		tat1
		t1au
		tawl3
		t1b
		t3ch
		t1ec
		t1ed
		tedd3
		4teg.
		4tegio
		t3eidi
		teimlad4w
		tel4y
		t3em.
		t4emi
		t1en
		ten4d
		te4ne
		terf4
		terfyn5
		t1es
		t4esa
		tes4io
		tet4a
		3tew
		4tew.
		4tewc
		tew5id
		t1f
		tff2
		tff4e
		tfod4
		tfydd4
		t1g2
		tg4af
		tg4an
		tg4en
		tg4er
		tgl4a
		tgn2
		t2gor
		t5gor.
		t5goria
		t5gorn
		tg4wc
		tg4wy
		tgy3w
		t2h
		thalad4
		thal4m3
		thang5n
		th4ar
		thar4f
		th4at
		that5y
		th1e
		th4ef
		th5ell
		therfyn5
		thet4
		thl3a
		thl5ent
		th5let
		th3n
		th5nod
		th1o
		th5old
		thollt4
		thon4e
		thorad4
		thr3ac
		th3red
		thr5ent
		thrid4
		thro3f
		th5rwf
		thryd4
		thry5da
		th3ug
		th3um
		th3un
		th3us
		th1w
		th3wa
		th4wl
		th3wyd
		th3wyf
		thwysg4
		th3ych
		thydd5
		th5yma
		thyrf4au
		thyr3w
		thy4w
		2t1i
		t3ia
		tid3
		t3ie
		t3in
		ting3
		t4ino
		tion4
		t4iono
		tï5ol.
		tl3a
		tl4ae
		tl1e
		tl4en.
		tl3on
		tl3wy
		t3lyd
		t1n2
		t3och
		t4od.
		t3odd
		to4ec
		to3edi
		to4em
		to3esi
		tof3
		t3og3
		3tois
		t2ol
		tollt4
		tol3y
		t1om
		t3om.
		t1on
		ton4e
		t3ont
		3tor
		tor2a
		tor4c
		t3os
		to4wc
		to4wn
		tra3c
		tra3dd
		tr3adw
		tr3af.
		tra3g
		tra3na
		tra5ne
		tr3ant
		3traw
		tr3ed
		3tr4ef
		tref5a
		tref3l
		4treg
		tr3em.
		tr3ent
		3trew
		tr3id4
		tr5ig.
		tro4ada
		tr3odd
		tro5fa
		tr3ola
		tr3olo
		tr3olw
		tron4o
		tr3ont
		2trw
		tr4wm
		tr3wn
		tr5wyd.
		t5r4wydd
		tr3wyf
		try3da
		tryd4y
		try3f
		try3l
		tr5yn.
		3tryw
		ts2
		ts5ach
		t1se
		ts3i
		3tud
		tudr4
		1tum
		t1un3
		1tur
		t4urm
		tw2
		t3wai
		t1wc
		t1wn
		t1wr1
		twr4n
		3twya
		t3wyd
		3twye
		t3wyf
		tw4ym
		3twyo
		twysg4
		3twyw
		t1yc
		t1yd
		tydd5y
		ty5gar
		ty3li
		tymp4
		4t3yn.
		tyng5ad
		1tyr
		tyr2a
		tyr4es
		ty3wr
		2u1a
		ual3
		u2and
		u4ane
		u3ar
		u3aw
		ub1
		2uc
		uch1
		uch3e
		uch5ed
		ud3ad
		u5dale
		udd1
		udd3a
		udd4eg
		udd3el
		udd3f
		udd3i
		ud5eir
		ud3er
		ud3i
		ud1l
		udr3
		ud5rwydd
		ud2w
		ud3wn
		ud3wr
		ud3yn
		u1e
		uedd3
		u4estai.
		u4estau
		u4estwr
		u4esty
		uf5au.
		uff4y
		uf3y
		ug3ad
		ug3af
		ug3en
		ug3i
		ugl3a
		ugl3e
		ug3lw
		ugn3
		ug1o
		ug1u
		ug1w
		ug3y
		u1h2
		u1i
		ul3ad
		ul3af
		u5lan.
		u5lann
		ul3ant
		u5lath
		ul3d
		u2l1e
		ul1f
		ul5igr
		ull1
		u1lo
		ul3oc
		ul3od
		ulon3
		ulon5e
		ul1u
		ul1w
		ul3yc
		u3lyd
		un1
		un4edy
		un5ell
		un5es.
		un3i
		unig3
		un5od.
		un2ol
		un5ol.
		2u1o
		uog3
		u3os3
		up2
		ur1
		urb4w
		ur5ddu
		ur3e
		ur5fau
		ur4fl
		ur2gy
		4urn.
		urof4
		ur2s3
		ur4ty
		ur4ud
		u5rwydd
		ur3y
		ur4yw
		1us.
		us4edda
		us5end
		usg1
		4usi.
		us3o
		3usr
		us3ter
		us3tod
		us3tr
		ut3a
		ut1e
		uth4r3
		uth3u
		uth4un
		ut3o
		utr3
		2u1w
		u2wc
		uwch3
		u1y
		2wa
		wac5ew
		wadd3
		wad2n3
		w5adwy.
		waen4i
		waer2
		wag1
		w1ai
		w3ai.
		w3aid
		w2air
		w3ais
		w4ait
		wallt5
		w4an.
		wan3a
		wan3e
		wan3o
		war5ddr
		war3e
		war4edd
		war5ia
		warth4
		wart5hai
		wart5has
		wart5hi
		wart5hw
		war3w
		3w4as.
		w3ase
		was4g
		w3asi
		w3aso
		w4as4t
		w3asw
		wat5er
		w1au
		2wb
		wbl5es
		w2c
		2wca
		wc4ed
		wch1
		4wchu
		2wci
		wc5wll
		wc4yn
		2wd
		wdd3eg
		w5ddew
		wd2e
		wd3ed
		wde3n4a
		wde5n4e
		wd3i
		wd4ih
		wd3ly
		w3dod.
		wdr1
		wd4ra
		wdry4
		wd2u
		w1eb3
		2w1ec
		2w3ed.
		w4eda
		4weddf
		4weddi
		4wedi
		w3edig
		we4gi
		wegr4
		wein3
		well5ti
		wel3o
		welw5l
		2w1em
		wen3au
		wen4d
		2w3ent
		wenwyn5
		wen3y
		2w3er.
		wer4i
		wer5id
		w4ers
		wer4yd
		2wes
		4w3esi
		w4esir
		w4esit
		5west.
		west4ai
		w1et
		w4eth
		2weu
		weu2g
		weun3
		2wf2
		w1fa
		w1fe
		wff3a
		w1fi
		wf4id
		w1fo
		wfor2
		w1fw
		wf4wy
		w3fy
		wg1
		2wg.
		w5gig.
		2wgl
		wg3n
		2w1h2
		w3he
		w3hw
		2wi
		wi4an
		wib5an
		wibl5a
		wib5ol
		widl3
		wi4fr
		3wig1
		wigl5e
		wil3
		win5gada
		win5gade
		win5gadi
		win5gado
		w4ione
		wir3
		wisg3
		w1it
		3wiw.
		wiw4e
		2wl
		3wlad.
		wlan3
		wl4co
		wl3in
		w4lip
		wll5yn
		wl5ws.
		wl4yc
		2wm
		wm3a
		wman3
		wm4br
		wm2i
		wm5iai
		wm5ian
		wm4wl
		wn1
		wn5adwy.
		wn2ae
		2wnd
		wn3de
		wn3di
		wndr3
		wn4ei
		wn4êl
		2wn3g
		wngl4
		wn3in
		wn3l
		wn2o
		w4n3oc
		wn3odd
		wn3og
		wn3ol
		w4n3om
		w4n3on
		2wnw
		2w1o
		w2od
		w3od.
		w3odd
		w2ol
		w3ol.
		w3olae
		w2or
		2wp
		wp3e
		wpl1
		wp5wrd
		wr5aet
		wrb5yn
		wrc2
		wr3ca
		wr4ce
		wr4ch3
		wr4ci
		wr5cwd
		2wrd
		wr5dei
		wr3ed
		wreig3
		wr5esi
		wr3f
		wr5fau
		wr4fi
		4wri.
		wrid3
		wr3id.
		wr3ie
		wr3l
		wr4ll
		wr3n2a
		wrn4es
		wr3no
		wr1o
		wr2t
		wrth3
		wr1w
		wr4ws
		w5rwydd
		wry4w
		ws5bre
		ws3e
		ws3g
		ws4gl
		ws4ig
		ws4og
		ws4ta
		wst5an
		ws5ter.
		wstr3
		ws4us
		ws3wa
		2wt
		wt3a
		wtan3
		wt3em
		wt5ery
		wth1
		4wth.
		wth3w
		wt3od
		wt3wy
		wt3y
		2w1w
		2wya
		wy5alc
		4wybr
		wybr5y
		wy3bu
		w1yc
		wych3
		wyd3a
		2wydd
		wydd4ly
		wydd4yd
		wydr3o
		2wydy
		2wye
		wy3fr
		wy3h
		2wyi
		2wyl
		wyl4deb
		wyll3a
		wyn5ad.
		4wynd
		wyn3eg
		wyn3f
		wyn3g4
		wy4ni
		wyn3o
		wyn3y
		2wyo
		wyr3ad
		wy3ran
		5wyrdd.
		wyrl3i
		2wys
		2wyt
		2wyw
		wy3wr
		wy3wy
		2wyy
		2y1a
		y3ar3
		y4ar.
		y4arn
		2yb
		yb4ac
		yb5edd
		yber4
		ybl1
		yb3ly
		ybr1
		ybr3i
		yb3w
		ych1
		ychan5
		ych4anwr
		ych5ei
		ych3r
		4ychwe
		ych3wy
		ychwy5na
		ychwy5ne
		ycl3
		2yd.
		2yda
		yd3ad
		yd4al
		yd2an3
		y3dana
		y3dane
		yd3ant
		y5danw
		y3dar
		yd3as
		yd3au
		ydd3
		ydd5an
		yd4de
		yd4df4
		yd4di4
		ydd4in.
		ydd4of
		ydd5yn.
		yddy5ne
		ydd4ysg
		2yde
		y3deb
		yd3ed
		yd4eddau
		yd3ei
		yd3er
		yd4eu
		yd5ffu
		ydfwr3
		ydfyn3
		yd3i
		yd1l
		yd4ma
		yd2ne
		ydne5b
		2yd3o
		yd4od.
		ydol3
		yd4os
		4ydrau
		ydr3ec
		ydr3em
		ydr5esid
		yd3rew
		yd4ri
		4ydria
		ydr3oc
		4ydrol
		ydr5wyd.
		yd5rwydd
		4ydry
		ydr3yc
		2ydw
		yd3wa
		yd5wed
		ydweithi5ol
		ydwel5e
		yd3wr
		yd1y
		ydy4l
		y1e
		y3el
		y4era
		y4ern
		2yf1
		y4f3ag
		yf3ai
		yfan3t
		yf3are
		yf3arh
		yfar5wa
		yf3eda
		yf3ede
		yf3edi
		yf3edo
		yf3edw
		yf3ei
		yfel3
		yf5erf
		yfer3n
		yf5esi
		yf5ewi
		yff1
		yf4fa
		yf5fait
		yf5fei
		y4ff3i
		yff5in
		y4ffl
		yffr3a
		yffro5ed
		yffro5em
		yffro5en
		yffro5wc
		yffr3w
		yff3ry
		yf3i
		yfl4ed
		yflo3e
		yf3ne
		yf3no
		yf3ny
		yf3o
		yf5od.
		yfogl4
		yf5rait
		yfra5ne
		yf5ryw
		yf3u
		yf5wng
		yf3yg
		yf5yn.
		yfy3na
		yfy5ne
		yfyng5
		yf4yt
		yg1
		yg3a
		yg5adu
		yg4ar
		ygeg4
		yg4eid
		yg3i
		yg4il
		3ygin
		ygl3a
		ygl3o
		ygl3w
		ygl3y
		ygn3
		yg3o
		yg4oe
		yg4of
		ygr1
		ygrad4
		yg5wyd
		y4gyc
		4ygyd
		y1h2
		y2he
		yhe3i
		yhe3w
		y1i
		y3ie
		yl3ad.
		yl5adwy.
		yl3af
		ylan3
		yl3ant
		y5law.
		2ylc
		ylch3w
		yl4dera
		yl1e
		yl1f
		y3lin
		y4lit
		yll5ad.
		yll3e
		4yllf
		yll5ida
		yll3o
		yll3w
		yll3y
		yl5nos
		yl3oc
		yl3od
		yl3on
		yl5ore
		y4lu.
		4ylwe
		yl3wy
		yl1y
		ym5ait
		ym4al
		ym5an.
		yman5t
		ymar5w
		ymbl2
		ym5edr
		ym4eri
		ym5es3u
		3ymg
		ym3heu
		ym2le
		ym2li
		ymlo5ne
		ym4oli
		ym3on
		ymp3a
		ym4pi
		ymp5od
		ym3pr
		ymra5ne
		ymr5ig
		ymro5e
		ym4ru
		ym3se
		ym4um
		5ymwyb
		ym3y
		ymyn5y
		ym5yra
		ym5yre
		ym5yri
		ym5yro
		ym5yrw
		yn4ada
		yn3ae
		yn3af
		yn3ai
		yn3an3
		ynas3
		2yn3au
		yn4aw
		yn5byn
		ync5ed
		yn3dir
		yn4eb
		yn3ec
		yn3ed.
		yn3edd
		yn2eg
		yn3ei
		yn3em
		yn3en
		yn3er
		y3nesa
		y4nesau
		2ynf
		ynfyd3
		2yng1
		yn4ge
		yng5er
		yn3gl
		yniaw4
		yni4d
		yn3i4f
		y3nig
		yn5igy
		yn3il3
		yn3n
		yn1o
		yn5o5ad
		yn5odd
		yn4odi
		yn4ody
		yn3oe
		yn3os4
		2ynr
		ynt1
		ynt4a
		yn4te
		yn4ti
		yn4to
		yn4tu
		yn4ud
		yn1w
		yn3wa
		yn2w4e
		yn3wy
		yn4wyr
		yn1y
		yn2yc
		ynydd5
		y1o
		ypl3a
		ypl3e
		ypl3o
		ypl3w
		yp3ly
		yr3ae
		yr3af
		yra3na
		yra3ne
		yr3ant
		y4r3au
		yr4ch
		yrch3e
		yrch3o
		yrch3w
		yrch3y
		yr4dd3
		yr5ddyd
		yr1e
		yr2ei
		yr5el.
		yren5d
		yrf3e
		yr3ff4
		yr4fu
		yrf5yd
		y4ria
		yr3id
		yr2l
		yr3ly
		yrn3
		yr1o
		yr5ol.
		yr2s
		yr1w
		yr5way
		yr1y
		2ysa
		ys3aw
		2ysb
		ysb5ïw
		ys4bl
		ysb3yd
		2yse
		ys5etl
		2ysf
		4ysgar.
		ys5garai
		ys5garasa
		ys5garia
		ys5garwy
		ysge4
		ysgl4e
		ysg5lw
		ys4gn
		3ysgr
		ys4gy
		2ysi
		ys5ni.
		2yso
		ys3od
		4ysol
		ys5ol.
		ys3ta
		4yste
		yst5eb
		ys5ted
		ys3ter
		ys4try
		yst4w
		ys3u
		2ysw
		ys4we
		ys4wi
		2ys3y
		ys4yg
		yt3ad
		yt1e
		yth3a
		yth3e
		ythi3e
		yth3l
		yth3o
		yth4re
		ythr5ec
		ythr5ed
		ythr5es
		yth5reu
		ythr3o
		yth5rwb
		ythr5yc
		yth5ur
		yth3w
		yth3yn
		yt5iro
		yt3o
		ytr2
		yt3ras
		yt3s
		ytw5ad
		yt3wy
		yt5ysa
		2yw
		yw4ae
		y3wait
		y1wc
		y3wedd
		y5weddia
		yw5eg.
		y4wel
		yw5en.
		yw3es
		yw1g2
		y4wia
		yw3id
		y4wio
		y4wir.
		y1wn
		yw3ol
		y2wr1
		ywr4a
		ywr5ain
		y4wyc
		y3wyf
		ywy3na
		ywy5ne
		y1y
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
